Massachusetts, session 194th, S808.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, are hereby
amended by adding the following chapter:-
Chapter 176Y
SECTION 1. DISCLOSURE OF BENEFIT TERMS.
(a) An employee benefit plan or health insurance policy shall: (1) if applicable, disclose
that the benefit for dental care services offered is limited to the least costly treatment; and (2)
specify in dollars and cents the amount of the payment or reimbursement to be provided for
dental care services or define AND explain the standard on which payment of benefits or
reimbursement for the cost of dental care services is based, such as: (A) "usual and customary"
of 3

fees; (B) "reasonable and customary fees; (C) "usual, customary, and reasonable" fees; or (D)
preset fee schedule or (E) words of similar meaning.
(b) A person or entity who provides or issues an employee benefit plan or health
insurance policy or the employer or employee organization, if applicable, shall establish an
Internet website to provide resources and accurate information to dentists, insureds, participants,
employees, and members, including the standard on which reimbursement is based.
(c) An employee benefit plan or health insurance policy shall make accessible on the
Internet website established under subsection (b) information about the plan or policy sufficient
for patients and dentists to determine the type of dental care services covered by the plan or
policy and the amount of the payment or reimbursement available for those services under the
plan or policy. Access to the Internet website must be at no charge to patients under the plan or
policy and dentists providing dental care services to the patients whether in network or out of
network.
SECTION 2.
(a) The employee benefit plan or health insurance policy shall: (1) provide: (A) that
payment or reimbursement for a noncontracting provider dentist shall be the same or greater as
payment or reimbursement for a contracting provider dentist; (B) that the party to or
beneficiary of the plan or policy may assign the right to payment or reimbursement to the
dentist who provides the dental care services; and (C) one or more methods of payment or
reimbursement that provide the dentist 100 percent of the contracted amount of the payment or
reimbursement and that do not require the dentist to incur a fee to access the payment or
reimbursement; and (2) disclose on the Internet website required under and on request of a
of 3

dentist or a party to or beneficiary of the plan or policy the fees, if any, associated with the
methods of payment or reimbursement available under the plan or policy.
SECTION 3.
(a) An employee benefit plan or health insurance policy may not: (1) interfere with or
prevent an individual who is a party to or beneficiary of the plan or policy from selecting a
dentist of the individual's choice to provide a dental care service the plan or policy offers if the
dentist selected is licensed in this state to provide the service; (2) deny a dentist the right to
participate as a contracting provider under the plan or policy if the dentist is licensed to provide
the dental care services the plan or policy offers; (3) authorize a person to regulate, interfere
with, or intervene in the provision of dental care services a dentist provides a patient, including
diagnosis, if the dentist practices within the scope of the dentist's license; (4) require a dentist
to make or obtain a dental x-ray or other diagnostic aid in providing dental care services; or (5)
deduct the amount of an overpayment of a claim from a payment or reimbursement of another
claim unless both claims were for dental services provided to the same patient by the same
dentist.
(b) This section does not prohibit the predetermination of benefits for dental care
expenses before the attending dentist provides treatment. An employee benefit plan or health
insurance policy that provides a written predetermination of benefits to a dentist with respect to a
dental care service for a patient that includes a specific benefit payment or reimbursement
amount may not pay or reimburse the dentist for providing that service to the patient in an
amount that is less than the amount set forth in the predetermination.
of 3